Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1819
Murder; warrant for arrest of suspect; when required.

The coroner is hereby authorized and required, on a request of a majority of the coroner's jury, to issue a warrant for any person suspected of having committed the crime of murder, and hold such person on said warrant until the inquest over the body is closed.

Laws 1879, § 114, p. 384;

R.S.1913, § 5681;

C.S.1922, § 5011;

C.S.1929, § 26-1520;

R.S.1943, § 23-1819;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 80.